Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-808
Lien; time of attaching.

The lien provided for in sections 57-801 to 57-820 arises on the date of the furnishing of the first item of material or services or the date of performance of the first labor. Upon compliance with the provisions of section 57-811, such lien shall be preferred to all other titles, charges, liens, or encumbrances which may attach to or upon any of the property upon which a lien is given by the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 subsequent to the date the lien herein provided for arises.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 8, p. 811.